RHVoice/src/scripts/Belarusian/numbers.foma
# Copyright (C) 2025  Zvonimir Stanecic <zvonimirek222@yandex.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9;
define Digit %0|NZDigit;
define Number (%+|%-) [%0|[NZDigit Digit^<16]] (%%|%°);

define RB (%%|%°) .#. ; 

define InsertThousands 
[..] -> тЫсяч || Digit _ Digit^3 RB ; 

define InsertMillions 
[..] -> мільЁнаў || Digit _ Digit^3 тЫсяч ;

define InsertBillions 
[..] -> мільЯрдаў || Digit _ Digit^3 мільЁнаў;

define InsertTrillions 
[..] -> трыльЁнаў || Digit _ Digit^3 мільЯрдаў;

define RemoveSkippedParts 
%0 %0 %0 [тЫсяч|мільЁнаў|мільЯрдаў|трыльЁнаў] -> 0 ;

define Units %0:0|1:адзІн|2:двА|3:трЫ|4:чатЫры|5:пЯць|6:шЭсць|7:сЕм|8:вОсем|9:дзЕвяць;

define Teens 1:0 [%0:дзЕсяць|1:адзінАццаць|2:дванАццаць|3:трынАццаць|4:чатырнАццаць|5:пятнАццаць|6:шаснАццаць|7:сямнАццаць|8:васямнАццаць|9:дзевятнАццаць];

define Tens %0:0|2:двАццаць|3:трЫццаць|4:сОрак|5:пяцьдзясЯт|6:шЭсцьдзесят|7:сЕмдзесят|8:вОсемдзесят|9:дзевянОста;

define Hundreds %0:0|1:стО|2:дзьвЕсце|3:трЫста|4:чатЫрыста|5:пяцьсОт|6:шэсцьсОт|7:семсОт|8:восемсОт|9:дзевяцьсОт;

define UpToThousand %0:нУль .P. [[(Hundreds) Teens] | [((Hundreds) Tens) Units]];

define DigitsToWords 
UpToThousand @-> ,, 
%+ @-> плЮс ,, 
%- @-> мІнус ,, 
%% @-> адсОткаў ,, 
%° @-> грАдусаў ; 

define FixCase 
тЫсяч:тЫсяча|мільЁнаў:мільЁн|мільЯрдаў:мільЯрд|трыльЁнаў:трыльЁн|адсОткаў:адсОтак|грАдусаў:грАдус -> || адзІн _ ,, 
тЫсяч:тЫсячы|мільЁнаў:мільЁны|мільЯрдаў:мільЯрды|трыльЁнаў:трыльЁны|адсОткаў:адсОтка|грАдусаў:грАдуса -> || двА|трЫ|чатЫры _ ;

define FixGender 
адзІн -> аднА || _ тЫсяча ,, 
двА -> дзьвЕ || _ тЫсячы ; 

define RemoveOne 
аднА -> 0 || .#. | GroupName _ тЫсяча,, 
адзІн -> 0 || .#. | GroupName _ мільЁн,, 
адзІн -> 0 || .#.  | GroupName _ мільЯрд,, 
адзІн -> 0 || .#. | GroupName _ трыльЁн ; 

regex 
Number .o. 
InsertThousands .o. 
InsertMillions .o. 
InsertBillions .o. 
InsertTrillions .o.
RemoveSkippedParts .o. 
DigitsToWords .o. 
FixCase .o. 
FixGender .o.
RemoveOne;
